Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1624
Council; suspension or termination; referendum.

(1) The council may on its own initiative and shall upon the petition of retail marketers representing at least thirty-five percent, as determined by the council, of the total volume of odorized propane sold at retail in the State of Nebraska hold a referendum to be conducted by an independent accounting firm selected by the council to determine whether the council should be suspended or terminated. The council shall pay the costs of the referendum under this section.

(2) The council shall be suspended or terminated if suspension or termination is approved by retail marketers representing more than fifty percent, as determined by the council, of the total volume of odorized propane sold at retail in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 24.